North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 4. Relevancy and Its Limits.
Rule 406.
Habit; routine practice.

Evidence of the habit of a person or of the routine practice of an organization, whether corroborated or not and regardless of the presence of eyewitnesses, is relevant to prove that the conduct of the person or organization on a particular occasion was in conformity with the habit or routine practice.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 406.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“An oft-quoted paragraph, McCormick § 162, p. 340, describes habit in terms effectively contrasting it with character.

‘Character and habit are close akin. “Character” is a generalized description of one’s disposition, or of one’s disposition in respect to a general trait, such as honesty, temperance, or peacefulness. “Habit,” in modern usage, both lay and psychological, is more specific. It describes one’s regular response to a repeated specific situation. If we speak of character for care, we think of the person’s tendency to act prudently in all the varying situations of life, in business, family life, in handling automobiles and in walking across the street. A habit, on the other hand, is the person’s regular practice of meeting a particular kind of situation with a specific type of conduct, such as the habit of going down a particular stairway two stairs at a time, or of giving the hand-signal for a left turn, or of alighting from railway cars while they are moving. The doing of the habitual acts may become semi-automatic.’

Equivalent behavior on the part of a group is designated ‘routine practice of an organization’ in the rule.

Agreement is general that habit evidence is highly persuasive as proof of conduct on a particular occasion. Again quoting McCormick § 162, p. 341:

‘Character may be thought of as the sum of one’s habits though doubtless it is more than this. But unquestionably the uniformity of one’s response to habit is far greater than the consistency with which one’s conduct conforms to character or disposition. Even though character comes in only exceptionally as evidence of an act, surely any sensible man in investigating whether X did a particular act would be greatly helped in his inquiry by evidence as to whether he was in the habit of doing it.’

When disagreement has appeared, its focus has been upon the question what constitutes habit, and the reason for this is readily apparent. The extent to which instances must be multiplied and consistency of behavior maintained in order to rise to the status of habit inevitably gives rise to difference of opinion. Lewan, Rationale of Habit Evidence, 16 Syracuse L.Rev. 39, 49 (1964). While adequacy of sampling and uniformity of response are key factors, precise standards for measuring their sufficiency for evidence purposes cannot be formulated.

The rule is consistent with prevailing views. Much evidence is excluded simply because of failure to achieve the status of habit. Thus, evidence of intemperate ‘habits’ is generally excluded when offered as proof of drunkenness in accident cases, Annot., 46 A.L.R.2d 103, and evidence of other assaults is inadmissible to prove the instant one in a civil assault action, Annot., 66 A.L.R.2d 806.In Levin v. United States, 119 U.S.App. D.C. 156, 338 F.2d 265 (1964), testimony as to the religious ‘habits’ of the accused, offered as tending to prove that he was at home observing the Sabbath rather than out obtained money through larceny by trick, was held properly excluded:

‘It seems apparent to us that an individual’s religious practices would not be the type of activities which would lend themselves to the characterization of “invariable regularity.” (1 Wigmore 520.) Certainly the very volitional basis of the activity raises serious questions as to its invariable nature, and hence its probative value.’
Id.
at 272.

These rulings are not inconsistent with the trend towards admitting evidence of business transactions between one of the parties and a third person as tending to prove that he made the same bargain or proposal in the litigated situation. Slough, Relevancy Unraveled, 6 Kan.L.Rev. 38-41 (1957). Nor are they inconsistent with such cases as Whittemore v. Lockheed Aircraft Corp., 65 Cal.App.2d 737, 151 P.2d 670 (1944), upholding the admission of evidence that plaintiff’s intestate had on four other occasions flown planes from defendant’s factory for delivery to his employer airline, offered to prove that he was piloting rather than a guest on a plane which crashed and killed all on board while en route for delivery.

A considerable body of authority has required that evidence of the routine practice of an organization be corroborated as a condition precedent to its admission in evidence. Slough, Relevancy Unraveled, 5 Kan.L.Rev. 404, 449 (1957). This requirement is specifically rejected by the rule on the ground that it relates to the sufficiency of the evidence rather than admissibility. * * * The rule also rejects the requirement of the absence of eyewitnesses, sometimes encountered with respect to admitting habit evidence to prove freedom from contributory negligence in wrongful death cases.”

Rule 406 is consistent with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 95 (1982).

Rule 407.
Subsequent remedial measures.

When, after an event, measures are taken which, if taken previously, would have made the event less likely to occur, evidence of the subsequent measures is not admissible to prove negligence or culpable conduct in connection with the event. This rule does not require the exclusion of evidence of subsequent measures when offered for another purpose, such as proving ownership, control, or feasibility of precautionary measures, if those issues are controverted, or impeachment.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 407 except that the phrase “those issues are” has been inserted to clarify what must be controverted.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The rule incorporates conventional doctrine which excludes evidence of subsequent remedial measures as proof of an admission of fault. The rule rests on two grounds. (1) The conduct is not in fact an admission, since the conduct is equally consistent with injury by mere accident or through contributory negligence. Or, as Baron Bramwell put it, the rule rejects the notion that ‘because the world gets wiser as it gets older, therefore it was foolish before’.
Hart
v.

Lancashire & Yorkshire Ry. Co.,

21 L.T.R.N.S. 261, 263 (1869). Under a liberal theory of relevancy this ground alone would not support exclusion as the inference is still a possible one. (2) The other, and more impressive, ground for exclusion rests on a social policy of encouraging people to take, or at least not discouraging them from taking, steps in furtherance of added safety. The courts have applied this principle to exclude evidence of subsequent repairs, installation of safety devices, changes in company rules, and discharge of employees, and the language of the present rule is broad enough to encompass all of them. See

Falknor, Extrinsic Policies Affecting Admissibility,

10 Rutgers L.Rev. 574, 590 (1956).

The second sentence of the rule directs attention to the limitations of the rule. Exclusion is called for only when the evidence of subsequent remedial measures is offered as proof of negligence or culpable conduct. In effect it rejects the suggested inference that fault is admitted. Other purposes are, however, allowable, including ownership or control, existence of duty, and feasibility of precautionary measures, if controverted, and impeachment. 2 Wigmore § 283; Annot., 64 A.L.R.2d 1296. Two recent federal cases are illustrative.
Boeing Airplane Co.
v.

Brown,

291 F.2d 310 (9th Cir. 1961), an action against an airplane manufacturer for using an allegedly defectively designed alternator shaft which caused a plane crash, upheld the admission of evidence of subsequent design modification for the purpose of showing that design changes and safeguards were feasible. And

Powers

v.

J. B. Michael & Co.,

329 F.2d 674 (6th Cir. 1964), an action against a road contractor for negligent failure to put out warning signs, sustained the admission of evidence that defendant subsequently put out signs to show that the portion of the road in question was under defendant’s control. The requirement that the other purpose be controverted calls for automatic exclusion unless a genuine issue be present and allows the opposing party to lay the groundwork for exclusion by making an admission. Otherwise the factors of undue prejudice, confusion of issues, misleading the jury, and waste of time remain for consideration under Rule 403.”

The increasing tendency of federal courts is to hold that Rule 407 is not applicable to product liability cases. North Carolina courts have applied the rule excluding evidence of subsequent remedial measures in product liability cases. See
Jenkins
v.

Helgren,

26 N.C. App. 653 (1975). It is the intent of the Committee that the rule should apply to all types of actions.

Rule 407 is consistent with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 180 (1982).

Rule 408.
Compromise and offers to compromise.

Evidence of (1) furnishing or offering or promising to furnish, or (2) accepting or offering or promising to accept, a valuable consideration in compromising or attempting to compromise a claim which was disputed as to either validity or amount, is not admissible to prove liability for or invalidity of the claim or its amount. Evidence of conduct or evidence of statements made in compromise negotiations is likewise not admissible. This rule does not require the exclusion of any evidence otherwise discoverable merely because it is presented in the course of compromise negotiations. This rule also does not require exclusion when the evidence is offered for another purpose, such as proving bias or prejudice of a witness, negativing a contention of undue delay, or proving an effort to obstruct a criminal investigation or prosecution.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 408 except that the words “evidence of” were added to the second sentence. The addition is for the purpose of clarification and is not intended as a material change. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“As a matter of general agreement, evidence of an offer to compromise a claim is not receivable in evidence as an admission of, as the case may be, the validity or invalidity of the claim. As with evidence of subsequent remedial measures, dealt with in Rule 407, exclusion may be based on two grounds. (1) The evidence is irrelevant, since the offer may be motivated by a desire for peace rather than from any concession of weakness of position. The validity of this position will vary as the amount of the offer varies in relation to the size of the claim and may also be influenced by other circumstances. (2) A more consistently impressive ground is promotion of the public policy favoring the compromise and settlement of disputes. McCormick §§ 76, 251. While the rule is ordinarily phrased in terms of offers of compromise, it is apparent that a similar attitude must be taken with respect to completed compromise when offered against a party thereto. This latter situation will not, of course, ordinarily occur except when a party to the present litigation has compromised with a third person.”

North Carolina practice is consistent with Rule 408 in that an offer of compromise, as such, is not admissible to prove liability for or invalidity of a claim or its amount. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 180 (1982). The same rule applies to an offer to settle, or the actual settlement of, a third person’s claim arising out of the transaction in litigation.

Id.

at 56. The words “the claim” in the first sentence should be interpreted to include the claim that is the subject of the lawsuit and any other claim arising out of the same occurrence.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The policy considerations which underlie the rule do not come into play when the effort is to induce a creditor to settle an admittedly due amount for a lesser sum. McCormick § 251, p. 540. Hence the rule requires that the claim be disputed as to either validity or amount.”

The phrase “which was disputed” should be interpreted consistently with North Carolina decisional law concerning what constitutes a dispute. See
Wilson County Board of Education
v.

Lamm,

276 N.C. 487

(1970).

With respect to the second sentence of the rule, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The practical value of the common law rule has been greatly diminished by its inapplicability to admissions of fact, even though made in the course of compromise negotiations, unless hypothetical, stated to be ‘without prejudice,’ or so connected with the offer as to be inseparable from it. McCormick § 251, pp. 540-541. An inevitable effect is to inhibit freedom of communication with respect to compromise, even among lawyers. Another effect is the generation of controversy over whether a given statement falls within or without the protected area. These considerations account for the expansion of the rule herewith to include evidence of conduct or statements made in compromise negotiations, as well as the offer or completed compromise itself.”

Thus Rule 408 changes the current North Carolina practice that allows a “distinct admission of an independent fact” made during compromise negotiations to be received in evidence. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 180, at 56-57 (1982).

Policy reasons for the compromise rule do not apply to evidence discoverable outside of settlement negotiations. Thus the third sentence of Rule 408 states that evidence otherwise discoverable need not be excluded merely because it is presented in compromise discussions. There is not any North Carolina case law on this point.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“The final sentence of the rule serves to point out some limitations upon its applicability. Since the rule excludes only when the purpose is proving the validity or invalidity of the claim or its amount, an offer for another purpose is not within the rule. The illustrative situations mentioned in the rule are supported by the authorities. As to proving bias or prejudice of a witness, see Annot., 161 A.L.R. 395, contra,
Fenberg
v.

Rosenthal,

348 Ill.App. 510, 109 N.E.2d 402 (1952), and negativing a contention of lack of due diligence in presenting a claim, 4 Wigmore § 1061. An effort to ‘buy off’ the prosecution or a prosecuting witness in a criminal case is not within the policy of the rule of exclusion. McCormick, § 251, p. 542.”

The final sentence of the rule is consistent with North Carolina practice in that an offer for a purpose other than to prove the validity or invalidity of the claim or its amount is not within the rule. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 180, at 55, 56 (1982).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “An End to Settlement on the Courthouse Steps? Mediated Settlement Conferences in North Carolina Superior Courts,” see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1857 (1993).

Rule 409.
Payment of medical and other expenses.

Evidence of furnishing or offering or promising to pay medical, hospital, or other expenses occasioned by an injury is not admissible to prove liability for the injury.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 409, except that the phrase “other expenses” has been established for the phrase “similar expenses.”

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The considerations underlying this rule parallel those underlying Rules 407 and 408, which deal respectively with subsequent remedial measures and offers of compromise. As stated in Annot., 20 A.L.R.2d 291, 293:

‘[G]enerally, evidence of payment of medical, hospital, or similar expenses of an injured party by the opposing party, is not admissible, the reason often given being that such payment or offer is usually made from humane impulses and not from an admission of liability, and that to hold otherwise would tend to discourage assistance to the injured person.’ ”

Under current North Carolina law, rendering aid to an injured person or promising to render aid is not an admission of fault.

Rule 409 does not cover rendering aid but does not change existing North Carolina law that rendering aid to an injured person or promising to render aid is not an admission of fault.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 180, at 58 (1982).

Unlike the federal rule, which applies to “medical, hospital, or similar expenses,” this rule applies to “medical, hospital, or other expenses.” The phrase “other expenses” is intended to include, but is not limited to, lost wages and damage to property. The phrase “occasioned by an injury” is intended to include a property injury as well as a personal injury. The rule’s coverage of nonmedical expenses occasioned by either a personal or property injury is an expansion of the current North Carolina rule. See
Id.
However, this rule is intended to apply only to tort claims and not to claims in other actions such as child support.

Rule 409 is consistent with North Carolina practice in that evidence inadmissible under the rule to prove liability may be admissible for another purpose. See
Id.
§ 180, at 58-59 (1982). The rule is also consistent with North Carolina practice in that it does not bar evidence of conduct and statements outside of the simple act of furnishing or offering to pay medical expenses. As the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Contrary to Rule 408, dealing with offers of compromise, the present rule does not extend to conduct or statements not a part of the act of furnishing or offering or promising to pay. This difference in treatment arises from fundamental differences in nature. Communication is essential if compromises are to be effected, and consequently broad protection of statements is needed. This is not so in cases of payments or offers or promises to pay medical expenses, where factual statements may be expected to be incidental in nature.”

Rule 410.
Inadmissibility of pleas, plea discussions, and related statements.

Except as otherwise provided in this rule, evidence of the following is not, in any civil or criminal proceeding, admissible for or against the defendant who made the plea or was a participant in the plea discussions:

A plea of guilty which was later withdrawn;

A plea of no contest;

Any statement made in the course of any proceedings under Article 58 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes or comparable procedure in district court, or proceedings under Rule 11 of the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure or comparable procedure in another state, regarding a plea of guilty which was later withdrawn or a plea of no contest;

Any statement made in the course of plea discussions with an attorney for the prosecuting authority which do not result in a plea of guilty or which result in a plea of guilty later withdrawn.

However, such a statement is admissible in any proceeding wherein another statement made in the course of the same plea or plea discussions has been introduced and the statement ought in fairness be considered contemporaneously with it.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 410, except as noted below.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Withdrawn pleas of guilty were held inadmissible in federal prosecutions in
Kercheval
v.

United States,

274 U.S. 220, 47 S. Ct. 582, 71 L. Ed. 1009 (1927). The Court pointed out that to admit the withdrawn plea would effectively set at naught the allowance of withdrawal and place the accused in a dilemma utterly inconsistent with the decision to award him a trial. The New York Court of Appeals, in

People

v.

Spitaleri,

9 N.Y.2d 168, 212 N.Y.S.2d 53, 173 N.E.2d 35 (1961), reexamined and overturned its earlier decisions which had allowed admission. In addition to the reasons set forth in

Kercheval,

which was quoted at length, the court pointed out that the effect of admitting the plea was to compel defendant to take the stand by way of explanation and to open the way for the prosecution to call the lawyer who had represented him at the time of entering the plea. State court decisions for and against admissibility are collected in Annot., 86 A.L.R.2d 326.”

Subsection (2), regarding pleas of no contest is the same as the federal rule and is consistent with North Carolina law.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 177, at 41, 42 (1982).

The third paragraph differs from Fed. R. Evid. 410 by making a reference to Article 58 of General Statutes Chapter 15A, which specifies the procedure relating to guilty pleas in superior court. The third paragraph also refers to comparable procedures in district court, although no statutory scheme regulates plea negotiations in district court. See Official Commentary to Ch. 15A, Art. 58.

Prior to the 1979 amendments to Fed. R. Evid. 410 and Fed. R. Crim. P. 11(e)(6), it was questionable whether an otherwise voluntary admission to law enforcement officials was rendered inadmissible merely because it was made in hope of obtaining leniency by a plea. The Notes of the Advisory Committee on the amendment to Fed. R. Crim. P. 11(e)(6) state that the rule:

“makes inadmissible statements made ‘in the course of any proceedings under this rule regarding’ either a plea of guilty later withdrawn or a plea of no contest later withdrawn and also statements ‘made in the course of plea discussions with an attorney for the government which do not result in a plea of guilty or which result in a plea of guilty later withdrawn.’ It is not limited to statements by the defendant himself, and thus would cover statements by defense counsel regarding defendant’s incriminating admissions to him. It thus fully protects the plea discussion process . . . without attempting to deal with confrontations between suspects and law enforcement agents, which involve problems of quite different dimensions . . .. This change, it must be emphasized, does not compel the conclusion that statements made to law enforcement agents, especially when the agents purport to have authority to bargain, are inevitably admissible. Rather, the point is that such cases . . . must be resolved by that body of law dealing with police interrogations.”

If there has been a plea of guilty later withdrawn or a plea of no contest, the third paragraph of Rule 410 makes inadmissible statements made in the course of any proceedings relating to guilty pleas in the superior or district courts. This includes, for example, admissions by the defendant when he makes his plea in court and also admissions made to provide the factual basis for the plea. However, the rule is not limited to statements made in court. If the court were to defer its decision on a plea agreement pending examination of the presentence report, statements made to the probation officer in connection with the preparation of that report would come within the third paragraph. See Notes of Advisory Committee on the Amendment to Fed. R. Crim. P. 11(e)(6).

The last sentence of Rule 410 provides an exception to the general rule of nonadmissibility of the described statements. Such a statement is admissible “in any proceedings wherein another statement made in the course of the same plea or plea discussions has been introduced and the statement ought in fairness be considered contemporaneously with it.”

“. . . when evidence of statements made in the course of or as consequence of a certain plea or plea discussions are introduced under circumstances not prohibited by this rule (e.g., not ‘against’ the person who made the plea), other statements relating to the same plea or plea discussions may also be admitted when relevant to the matter at issue. For example, if a defendant upon a motion to dismiss a prosecution on some ground were able to admit certain statements made in aborted plea discussions in his favor, then other relevant statements made in the same plea discussions should be admissible against the defendant in the interest of determining the truth of the matter at issue. The language . . . follows closely that in Fed. R. Evid. 106, as the considerations involved are very similar.”
Id.

Unlike the federal rule, Rule 410 does not contain an exception permitting a statement made by the defendant under oath, on the record, and in the presence of counsel to be introduced in a criminal proceeding for perjury or false statement.

Rule 410 differs from the federal rule by making the described evidence inadmissible in favor of the defendant as well as against him. North Carolina practice in this area is governed in part by

G.S. 15A-1025

which is consistent with this rule.

G.S. 15A-1025

should be amended after Rule 410 is adopted.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A Deal with the Devil: Reevaluating Plea Bargains Offered to the Wrongfully Convicted,” see 99 N. C. L. Rev. Addendum 139 (2021).

Rule 411.
Liability insurance.

Evidence that a person was or was not insured against liability is not admissible upon the issue whether he acted negligently or otherwise wrongfully. This rule does not require the exclusion of evidence of insurance against liability when offered for another purpose, such as proof of agency, ownership, or control, or bias or prejudice of a witness.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 411. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The courts have with substantial unanimity rejected evidence of liability insurance for the purpose of proving fault, and absence of liability insurance as proof of lack of fault. At best the inference of fault from the fact of insurance coverage is a tenuous one, as is its converse. More important, no doubt, has been the feeling that knowledge of the presence or absence of liability insurance would induce juries to decide cases on improper grounds. McCormick § 168; Annot., 4 A.L.R.2d 761. The rule is drafted in broad terms so as to include contributory negligence or other fault of a plaintiff as well as fault of a defendant.

The second sentence points out the limits of the rule, using well established illustrations.
Id.
”

Rule 411 is consistent with North Carolina practice in barring evidence of insurance unless offered for a purpose other than to prove negligence. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 88 (1982).

Rule 412.
Rape or sex offense cases; relevance of victim’s past behavior.

As used in this rule, the term “sexual behavior” means sexual activity of the complainant other than the sexual act which is at issue in the indictment on trial.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sexual behavior of the complainant is irrelevant to any issue in the prosecution unless such behavior:

Was between the complainant and the defendant; or

Is evidence of specific instances of sexual behavior offered for the purpose of showing that the act or acts charged were not committed by the defendant; or

Is evidence of a pattern of sexual behavior so distinctive and so closely resembling the defendant’s version of the alleged encounter with the complainant as to tend to prove that such complainant consented to the act or acts charged or behaved in such a manner as to lead the defendant reasonably to believe that the complainant consented; or

Is evidence of sexual behavior offered as the basis of expert psychological or psychiatric opinion that the complainant fantasized or invented the act or acts charged.

Sexual behavior otherwise admissible under this rule may not be proved by reputation or opinion.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, unless and until the court determines that evidence of sexual behavior is relevant under subdivision (b), no reference to this behavior may be made in the presence of the jury and no evidence of this behavior may be introduced at any time during the trial of any of the following:

A charge of rape or a lesser included offense of rape.

A charge of a sex offense or a lesser included offense of a sex offense.

An offense being tried jointly with a charge of rape or a sex offense, or with a lesser included offense of rape or a sex offense.

A charge of sexual servitude under

G.S. 14-43.13

.Before any questions pertaining to such evidence are asked of any witness, the proponent of such evidence shall first apply to the court for a determination of the relevance of the sexual behavior to which it relates. The proponent of such evidence may make application either prior to trial pursuant to

G.S. 15A-952

, or during the trial at the time when the proponent desires to introduce such evidence. When application is made, the court shall conduct an in camera hearing, which shall be transcribed, to consider the proponent’s offer of proof and the argument of counsel, including any counsel for the complainant, to determine the extent to which such behavior is relevant. In the hearing, the proponent of the evidence shall establish the basis of admissibility of such evidence. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Rule 104, if the relevancy of the evidence which the proponent seeks to offer in the trial depends upon the fulfillment of a condition of fact, the court, at the in camera hearing or at a subsequent in camera hearing scheduled for that purpose, shall accept evidence on the issue of whether that condition of fact is fulfilled and shall determine that issue. If the court finds that the evidence is relevant, it shall enter an order stating that the evidence may be admitted and the nature of the questions which will be permitted.

Before any questions pertaining to such evidence are asked of any witness, the proponent of such evidence shall first apply to the court for a determination of the relevance of the sexual behavior to which it relates. The proponent of such evidence may make application either prior to trial pursuant to

G.S. 15A-952

, or during the trial at the time when the proponent desires to introduce such evidence. When application is made, the court shall conduct an in camera hearing, which shall be transcribed, to consider the proponent’s offer of proof and the argument of counsel, including any counsel for the complainant, to determine the extent to which such behavior is relevant. In the hearing, the proponent of the evidence shall establish the basis of admissibility of such evidence. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Rule 104, if the relevancy of the evidence which the proponent seeks to offer in the trial depends upon the fulfillment of a condition of fact, the court, at the in camera hearing or at a subsequent in camera hearing scheduled for that purpose, shall accept evidence on the issue of whether that condition of fact is fulfilled and shall determine that issue. If the court finds that the evidence is relevant, it shall enter an order stating that the evidence may be admitted and the nature of the questions which will be permitted.

The record of the in camera hearing and all evidence relating thereto shall be open to inspection only by the parties, the complainant, their attorneys and the court and its agents, and shall be used only as necessary for appellate review. At any probable cause hearing, the judge shall take cognizance of the evidence, if admissible, at the end of the in camera hearing without the questions being repeated or the evidence being resubmitted in open court.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 2018-75, s. 6(a).

Commentary

This rule differs substantially from Fed. R. Evid. 412. Except as noted below, the rule is the same as the current shield law, G.S. 8-58.6 [now repealed].

Subdivision (c), which is derived from the federal rule, was added to the current shield law to make it clear that sexual behavior otherwise admissible under this rule may not be proved by reputation or opinion.

The next to the last sentence of subdivision (d), which is derived from the federal rule, was added to the shield law to address the issue of conditional relevancy. The sentence provides that, notwithstanding Rule 104(b), if the relevancy of the evidence depends upon the fulfillment of a condition of fact, the court will hear evidence in the in camera proceeding and decide whether the condition of fact is fulfilled. The court should decide whether the defendant has presented sufficient evidence for a reasonable jury to find the proposition asserted to be true. If so, the defendant’s evidence should be admitted. If not, the evidence should be excluded. See S. Saltzburg and K. Redden,
Federal Rules of Evidence Manual
, at 221 — 27 (3d ed. 1982). Evidence should not be admitted on behalf of the defendant subject to connecting-up. The court should make sure, before any evidence of prior sexual activity is admitted, that the conditional relevance analysis has been satisfied.

Id.

at 90.

Rule 413.
Medical actions; statements to ameliorate or mitigate adverse outcome.

Statements by a health care provider apologizing for an adverse outcome in medical treatment, offers to undertake corrective or remedial treatment or actions, and gratuitous acts to assist affected persons shall not be admissible to prove negligence or culpable conduct by the health care provider in an action brought under Article 1B of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

History.

2004-149, s. 3.1.

Rule 414.
Evidence of medical expenses.

Evidence offered to prove past medical expenses shall be limited to evidence of the amounts actually paid to satisfy the bills that have been satisfied, regardless of the source of payment, and evidence of the amounts actually necessary to satisfy the bills that have been incurred but not yet satisfied. This rule does not impose upon any party an affirmative duty to seek a reduction in billed charges to which the party is not contractually entitled.

History.

2011-283, s. 1.1; 2011-317, s. 1.1.

Rule 415.
Evidence of bankruptcy asbestos trust claims.

In any civil action asserting personal injury claiming disease based upon exposure to asbestos, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that bankruptcy trust claims materials are relevant, authentic, and admissible in evidence in the civil action.

History.

2018-4, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to general provisions governing discovery, see

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 26.